Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2073.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 5612YH (4) 91 ss/ns H.F. 2073 Section 1. Section 49.57, subsection 2, Code 2026, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 2. After the name of each candidate for a partisan an 3 office with the authority to propose, approve, levy, or vote 4 for a tax, the name of the candidateâs political party shall 5 be printed in at least six point type. The names of political 6 parties and nonparty political organizations may be abbreviated 7 on the remainder of the ballot if both the full name and 8 the abbreviation appear in the voter instruction area of the 9 ballot. 10